Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 348.280 is amended to read:
348.280. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Determine which students are eligible to receive scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(b) Grant the appropriate scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(c) Make necessary rules for application and distribution  of the benefits available under ORS
348.270 and 348.272 and this section.
(d) In awarding scholarships pursuant  to its authority under ORS 348.520, give priority to stu-
dents who are eligible to receive scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(2) If the accounts established or designated by the State Treasurer under ORS 131A.360
and 131A.365 do not  contain sufficient moneys to provide scholarships to each student who
is eligible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270, the commission shall:
(a) Use all moneys available in the accounts established or designated by the State
Treasurer under ORS 131A.360 and 131A.365 to provide scholarships to students who  are eli-
gible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270; and
(b) Award moneys from the Oregon Opportunity Grant program  to students who are el-
igible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270.
[(2)] (3)  The [ Higher Education Coordinating ] commission shall establish rules and procedures
necessary  to  carry out the provisions of ORS 348.270 and 348.272 and this section, including but not
limited to the usual and customary rules for analyzing financial need.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 75 (SB 75-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 18, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 75 (SB 75-INTRO) Page 2